Illinois, session 104th, HB3609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be referred to as the 5Thermal Energy Network and Jobs Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and intent.7    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that:8        (1) This State has a strong interest in ensuring that 9    emissions of greenhouse gases from buildings are reduced 10    because buildings are one of this State's largest sources 11    of greenhouse gases due to the combustion of fossil fuels 12    for heating, domestic hot water production, cooking, and 13    other end uses.14        (2) The decarbonization of buildings must be pursued 15    in a manner that is affordable and accessible, preserves 16    and creates living-wage jobs, and retains the knowledge 17    and experience of the existing utility union workforce.18        (3) Thermal energy networks have the potential to 19    decarbonize buildings at the community and utility scale 20    and help achieve the goals of Public Act 102-662 (also 21    known as the Climate and Equitable Jobs Act).22        (4) Thermal energy networks consist of pipe loops 23    between multiple buildings and energy sources, which carry   HB3609 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1    water and can be connected to by building owners to 2    support heating and cooling and hot water services. 3    Building owners can connect to the loops to support water 4    heating and cooling and hot water services.5        (5) Many utilities in this State have been seeking to 6    develop thermal energy networks but have encountered legal 7    and regulatory barriers.8        (6) This State has a strong interest in ensuring an 9    adequate supply of reliable electrical power and, 10    therefore, needs to promote the development of alternative 11    power sources and take steps to assure reliable 12    deliverability. Thermal energy networks are highly 13    efficient because they use and exchange thermal energy 14    from many underground sources and buildings, including 15    recycled thermal energy, which minimizes impacts on the 16    electricity grid.17        (7) Access to thermal energy networks has the 18    potential to reduce the upfront and operating costs of 19    building electrification for customers.20        (8) Thermal loop technology provides benefits to 21    participants and non-participants alike, including 22    societal benefits to the environment and the market 23    benefits associated with the reduction of both the volume 24    and peak demand of electricity and natural gas.25        (9) A utility's access to capital, the utility's 26    experience with networked infrastructure in public   HB3609 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1    rights-of-way, and the requirement that the utility serve 2    all customers positions the utility well to develop and 3    scale thermal energy networks that are accessible to all 4    customers and to coordinate the development of thermal 5    energy networks with any orderly rightsizing of the 6    utility gas system.7        (10) This State also has an interest in the efficient 8    and reliable delivery of energy and the energy 9    infrastructure of the State, which interest is 10    acknowledged throughout the Public Utilities Act. Utility 11    corporations and other power suppliers share these 12    interests and, moreover, have a duty to protect 13    proprietary interests in the projects they fund. Such 14    investments of ratepayer resources can be protected by 15    establishing effective contractor qualification and 16    performance standards, including requirements for 17    prevailing wage rates, bona fide apprenticeship criteria, 18    and project labor agreements.19        (11) The construction industry is highly skilled and 20    labor intensive, and the installation of modern thermal 21    energy networks involves particularly complex work. 22    Therefore, effective qualification standards for craft 23    labor personnel employed on these projects are critically 24    needed to promote successful project delivery.25        (12) Finally, these findings are especially vital now 26    because the construction industry is experiencing   HB3609 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1    widespread skill shortages across the country, which are 2    crippling existing capital projects and threatening 3    projects planned for the future. The construction of 4    thermal energy networks will utilize many of the same 5    skills that the current utility and building trades 6    workforces already possess.7    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that passage 8of this Act is for the following purposes:9        (1) to remove the legal barriers to utility 10    development of thermal energy networks and require the 11    Illinois Commerce Commission, within 90 days after the 12    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 13    Assembly, to begin to authorize and direct utilities to 14    immediately commence piloting thermal energy networks in 15    each and every utility territory;16        (2) to direct and authorize the Illinois Commerce 17    Commission to develop a regulatory structure for utility 18    thermal energy networks that scales affordable and 19    accessible building electrification, protects customers, 20    and balances the role of incumbent monopoly utilities with 21    other market and public actors;22        (3) to promote the successful planning and delivery of 23    thermal energy networks and protect critical investments 24    in such projects by requiring the use of appropriate 25    quality craft labor policies that ensure the development 26    of and access to an adequate supply of well trained,   HB3609 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1    highly skilled craft persons needed to support timely, 2    reliable, high-quality projects;3        (4) to promote strong economic development and good 4    jobs for local residents in the expanding decarbonized 5    sector by requiring application of progressive State labor 6    and employment policies that ensure public utility 7    investments and related State subsidies create 8    unparalleled skill training and employment opportunities 9    for residents in project areas through the use of local 10    prevailing wage standards and successful, bona fide 11    apprenticeship programs or project labor agreements that 12    incorporate prevailing wage and training standards and 13    provide additional benefits for project owners and 14    workers; and15        (5) to promote the use of preapprenticeship programs 16    that will fortify and expand existing apprenticeship 17    programs through systematic outreach efforts to recruit 18    and assist persons from underrepresented and low income 19    communities by providing such persons with remedial 20    education, social services, and unique opportunities for 21    direct access into high-quality apprenticeship programs 22    and gainful employment in the growing building 23    decarbonization workforce. 24    Section 10. The Public Utilities Act is amended by 25changing Section 3-101 and by adding Sections 3-128, 3-129,   HB3609 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1and 8-513 as follows: 2    (220 ILCS 5/3-101)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 3-101)3    Sec. 3-101. Definitions. Unless otherwise specified, the 4terms set forth in Sections 3-102 through 3-129 3-126 are used 5in this Act as therein defined.6(Source: P.A. 97-96, eff. 7-13-11; 97-239, eff. 8-2-11; 797-813, eff. 7-13-12.) 8    (220 ILCS 5/3-128 new)9    Sec. 3-128. Thermal energy. "Thermal energy" means piped 10noncombustible fluids used for transferring heat into and out 11of buildings for the purpose of reducing any resultant onsite 12greenhouse gas emissions of all types of heating and cooling 13processes, including, but not limited to, comfort heating and 14cooling, domestic hot water, and refrigeration. 15    (220 ILCS 5/3-129 new)16    Sec. 3-129. Thermal energy network. "Thermal energy 17network" means all real estate, fixtures, and personal 18property operated, owned, used, or to be used for, in 19connection with, or to facilitate a utility-scale distribution 20infrastructure project that supplies non-combusting thermal 21energy. "Thermal energy network" includes real estate, 22fixtures, and personal property that is operated, owned, or 23used by multiple parties.   HB3609 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1    (220 ILCS 5/8-513 new)2    Sec. 8-513. Pilot thermal energy network development. 3    (a) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall initiate a 4proceeding within 6 months after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly to support the 6development of pilot thermal energy networks. The Commission 7shall consider matters in the proceeding, including, but not 8limited to, the appropriate ownership, market, and rate 9structures for pilot thermal energy networks and whether the 10provision of thermal energy services by thermal network energy 11providers is in the public interest.12    (b) Within 10 months after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, every gas public 14utility, electric public utility, or combination public 15utility serving over 100,000 customers shall file with the 16Commission a petition seeking Commission approval of at least 17one and no more than 3 proposed pilot thermal energy network 18projects. Designs for the projects should coordinate and 19maximize the value of existing State energy efficiency and 20weatherization programs and take advantage of federal funding 21opportunities to the extent practicable. No later than 18 22months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 23104th General Assembly, the Commission shall enter an order 24approving, approving with modification, or rejecting each 25proposed pilot thermal energy network project and shall direct   HB3609 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1the public utility to implement the pilot thermal energy 2network projects as approved or approved as modified. In 3considering whether to approve or approve as modified each 4pilot thermal energy network project, the Commission shall 5consider whether the pilot thermal energy network project is 6in the public interest, whether the pilot thermal energy 7network project will develop information useful for the 8Commission in adopting rules governing thermal energy 9networks, whether the pilot thermal energy network project 10furthers climate justice and emissions reduction, whether the 11pilot thermal energy network project advances financial and 12technical approaches to equitable and affordable building 13electrification, and whether the pilot thermal energy network 14project creates benefits to customers and society at large, 15including, but not limited to, public health benefits in areas 16with disproportionate environmental or public health burdens, 17job retention and creation, reliability, and increased 18affordability of renewable thermal energy options. After the 19filing of a petition, a utility may request the Commission to 20grant additional time for pilot development approval, which 21shall be approved for at least 6 months upon request or up to 2212 months upon a showing that additional time would benefit 23pilot development. 24    (c) If a utility proposes 3 pilot thermal energy network 25projects, at least one project shall be proposed in 26economically disadvantaged communities as defined in Section   HB3609 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b15-35 of the Energy Transition Act and at least one shall 2include an industrial heat application that may additionally 3include residential and commercial applications. Priority 4shall be given to pilot proposals that replace leak-prone 5natural gas distribution infrastructure with distribution 6infrastructure that supplies non-combusting thermal energy or 7that replaces thermal energy for buildings currently heated 8with electric resistance heat. Each public utility shall 9coordinate with other public utilities and consultants with 10expertise on successful pilot projects to ensure that the 11pilot projects are diverse and designed to inform the 12Commission's decisions in the proceeding on the various 13ownership, market, and rate structures for thermal energy 14networks. The pilot project proposals shall be made publicly 15available on the Commission's website. Utilities are 16encouraged to develop plans that enable and facilitate access 17to thermal loop technology benefits, including access by low 18and moderate income households. As part of any pilot project 19proposed pursuant to this Section, a public utility subject to 20this Section may propose to include customer rebates and 21incentives, and associated tariffs and proposed regulatory 22treatment, in a manner similar to what is included in 23Commission-approved electric energy efficiency plans pursuant 24to Section 8-103B of this Act. 25    (c-5) Each public utility shall hold at least one 26pre-filing public meeting to receive public comment concerning   HB3609 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1the proposed thermal energy network in the municipality where 2the thermal energy network is to be located. Notice of the 3public meeting shall be published in a newspaper of general 4circulation for 3 consecutive weeks, beginning no earlier than 5one month before the first public meeting. Notice of the 6public meeting, including a description of the thermal energy 7network, must be provided in writing to the clerk of the county 8where the project is to be located and to the Chief Clerk of 9the Commission. A representative of the Commission shall be 10invited to each pre-filing public meeting. 11    (d) Any gas public utility, electric public utility, or 12combination public utility constructing or operating a 13Commission-approved pilot thermal energy network project shall 14report to the Commission, on a quarterly basis and until 15completion of the pilot thermal energy network project, as 16determined by the Commission, the status of each pilot thermal 17energy network project. The Commission shall post and make 18publicly available the reports on its website. The report 19shall include, but not be limited to: 20        (1) the stage of development of each pilot project; 21        (2) the barriers to development; 22        (3) the number of customers served; 23        (4) the costs of the pilot project; 24        (5) the number of jobs retained or created by the 25    pilot project; and 26        (6) other information the Commission deems to be in   HB3609 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1    the public interest or considers likely to prove useful or 2    relevant to the rulemaking described in subsection (h). 3    (d-5) The Commission shall require projects submitted to 4the utility-scale renewable thermal energy network program for 5approval to include a proposed rate structure for thermal 6energy services supplied to network end users and consumer 7protection plans for end users. The Commission may approve the 8proposed rate structure if the projected heating and cooling 9costs for end users is not greater than the heating and cooling 10costs the end users would have incurred if the end users had 11not participated in the program. 12    (e) Any gas public utility, electric public utility, or 13combination public utility constructing or operating a 14Commission-approved pilot thermal energy network project shall 15demonstrate that it has entered into a labor peace agreement 16with a bona fide labor organization that is actively engaged 17in representing its employees. The labor peace agreement shall 18apply to the employees necessary for the ongoing maintenance 19and operation of the thermal energy network. The labor peace 20agreement shall be an ongoing material condition of 21authorization to maintain and operate the thermal energy 22networks. 23    (f) Any contractor or subcontractor that performs work on 24a pilot thermal energy network under this Section shall be a 25responsible bidder as described in Section 30-22 of the 26Illinois Procurement Code and shall certify that not less than   HB3609 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1prevailing wage, as determined under the Prevailing Wage Act, 2was or will be paid to employees who are engaged in 3construction activities associated with the pilot thermal 4energy network project. The contractor or subcontractor shall 5submit evidence to the Commission that it complied with the 6requirements of this subsection. 7    (g) For any pending application for a thermal energy 8network, the contractor or subcontractor shall submit evidence 9that the contractor or subcontractor has entered into a fully 10executed project labor agreement with the applicable local 11building trades council. The Commission shall not approve any 12pending applications until the contractor or subcontractor has 13submitted the information required under this subsection. 14    (h) Within 4 years after the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Commission 16shall adopt rules to, at a minimum: 17        (1) create fair market access rules for thermal energy 18    networks to accept thermal energy and that do not increase 19    greenhouse gas emissions or copollutants; 20        (2) to the extent it is in the public interest to do 21    so, exempt small-scale thermal energy networks from active 22    regulation by the Commission; 23        (3) promote the training and transition of utility 24    workers impacted by this amendatory Act of the 104th 25    General Assembly; and 26        (4) encourage third-party participation and   HB3609 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 12086 AAS 22184 b1    competition where it will maximize benefits to customers. 2    (i) A gas public utility, electric public utility, or 3combination public utility required to develop any pilot 4thermal energy network project under this Section shall be 5permitted to recover all reasonable and prudently incurred 6costs associated with the development, construction, and 7operation of one or more pilot thermal energy network projects 8through general rates set pursuant to Section 9-201 or through 9rates set in a Multi-Year Rate Plan pursuant to Section 1016-108.18. A gas public utility, electric public utility, or 11combination public utility developing a thermal energy network 12project that includes an industrial heat application may 13recover rates proportionally from each class of customer. The 14Commission shall have broad discretion in approving proposed 15pilot projects that are consistent with the public interest 16consistent with this Section and in approving all tariffs and 17issue other regulatory approvals as necessary to permit a 18pilot program that facilitates a full review of technologies, 19and associated policies, with respect to thermal network 20technology in this State.  21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.